District of Columbia statutes.
38-1417

Grants from Secretary of Education — Applications.

The Mayor may from time to time set dates by which applications for payments by the Mayor under § 38-1416 for any fiscal year must be filed. A payment under § 38-1416 by the Mayor may be made only if the application therefor:

(1)

Is approved by the Mayor upon his determination that the applicant meets the eligibility conditions of this subchapter; and

(2)

Contains such information as the Mayor and the Secretary may require to make determinations required under this subchapter and such assurances as they may find necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1935, Pub. L. 91-650, title III, § 308
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 31-927.
1981 Ed., § 31-1717.